Maryland, session 2026, SB0065.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated unless a
different meaning is clearly intended from the context.
(k) (1) “Campaign material” means any material that:
(i) contains text, graphics, or other images;
(ii) relates to a candidate, a [prospective] POTENTIAL candidate, or
the approval or rejection of a question or prospective question; and
(iii) is published, distributed, or disseminated.
(2) “Campaign material” includes:
(i) a qualifying paid digital communication;
(ii) any other material transmitted by or appearing on the Internet
or other electronic medium;
(iii) an oral commercial campaign advertisement; and
(iv) an automated or prerecorded oral communication.
(l) (1) “Candidate” means an individual who files a certificate of candidacy for
a public or party office.
(2) “Candidate” includes:
(i) an incumbent justice of the Supreme Court of Maryland or
Appellate Court of Maryland at an election for continuance in office; and
(ii) an individual, prior to that individual filing a certificate of
candidacy, if a campaign finance entity has been established on behalf of that individual.

SENATE BILL 65 3
(gg) “Political committee” means a combination of two or more individuals that has
as its major purpose promoting the success or defeat of a candidate, political party,
question, or prospective question submitted to a vote at any election.
13–107.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “DONATION” MEANS THE GIFT OR TRANSFER, OR PROMISE
OF GIFT OR TRANSFER, OF MONEY OR ANY OTHER THING OF VALUE TO A PERSON
THAT MAKES DISBURSEMENTS FOR AN EXPLORATORY COMMITTEE.
(II) “DONATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE ANY AMOUNT OF MONEY
OR ANY OTHER THING OF VALUE:
1. RECEIVED BY A PERSON IN THE ORDINARY COURSE OF
ANY TRADE OR BUSINESS CONDUCTED BY THE PERSON, WHETHER FOR PROFIT OR
NOT FOR PROFIT, OR IN THE FORM OF INVESTMENTS IN THE PERSON’S BUSINESS;
OR
2. A. THAT THE DONOR AND THE PERSON RECEIVING
THE MONEY OR THING OF VALUE EXPRESSLY AGREE IN WRITING MAY NOT BE USED
FOR AN EXPLORATORY COMMITTEE; AND
B. IN THE CASE OF A MONETARY DONATION, IS
DEPOSITED IN A SEPARATE BANK ACCOUNT THAT IS NEVER USED FOR AN
EXPLORATORY COMMITTEE.
(3) “EXPLORATORY COMMITTEE” MEANS AN ENTITY ESTABLISHED
BY A POTENTIAL CANDIDATE FOR A PUBLIC OFFICE TO DETERMINE THE POTENTIAL
CANDIDATE’S VIABILITY FOR THAT PUBLIC OFFICE.
(B) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN §§ 13–220.1 AND 13–220.2 OF THIS
TITLE AND SUBTITLE 2, PART V OF THIS TITLE, ALL PROVISIONS OF THIS TITLE
THAT APPLY TO A POLITICAL COMMITTEE ALSO APPLY TO AN EXPLORATORY
COMMITTEE.
(C) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, AN EXPLORATORY
COMMITTEE FOR AN INDIVIDUAL MAY RECEIVE FUNDS AND MAKE DISBURSEMENTS
TO DETERMINE THE INDIVIDUAL’S VIABILITY FOR A PUBLIC OFFICE.
(D) AN EXPLORATORY COMMITTEE MAY MAKE A DISBURSEMENT:

SENATE BILL 65
(1) ONLY FOR PURPOSES RELATED TO DETERMINING THE POTENTIAL
CANDIDATE’S VIABILITY FOR A PUBLIC OFFICE; AND
(2) ONLY FOR THE FOLLOWING:
(I) CONDUCTING SURVEYS OR POLLS REGARDING VIABILITY OF
THE POTENTIAL CANDIDATE FOR A PUBLIC OFFICE;
(II) DIRECT MAILINGS AND OTHER COMMUNICATIONS TO
POTENTIAL VOTERS;
(III) EMPLOYING STAFF;
(IV) ESTABLISHING A WEBSITE;
(V) QUALIFYING PAID DIGITAL COMMUNICATIONS;
(VI) RENTING OR LEASING OFFICE SPACE;
(VII) PURCHASING ELECTRONIC EQUIPMENT, INCLUDING
COMPUTERS AND TELEPHONES; AND
(VIII) SECURITY.
(E) AN EXPLORATORY COMMITTEE MAY NOT PAY ANY EXPENSE IN ADVANCE
FOR GOODS OR SERVICES TO BE USED BY THE POLITICAL COMMITTEE OF THE
POTENTIAL CANDIDATE ONCE THE POTENTIAL CANDIDATE REGISTERS AN
AUTHORIZED CANDIDATE CAMPAIGN COMMITTEE.
(F) IF AN AUTHORIZED CANDIDATE CAMPAIGN COMMITTEE RESULTS FROM
THE EXPLORATORY COMMITTEE, ANY PURCHASES MADE BY THE AUTHORIZED
CANDIDATE CAMPAIGN COMMITTEE OF EQUIPMENT FROM THE EXPLORATORY
COMMITTEE SHALL BE MADE AT THE FAIR MARKET VALUE OF THE EQUIPMENT.
(G) (1) AN EXPLORATORY COMMITTEE SHALL RETURN ANY REMAINING
FUNDS RECEIVED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION WITHIN 120 DAYS AFTER:
(I) A POTENTIAL CANDIDATE:
1. TIMELY FILES A CERTIFICATE OF CANDIDACY FOR A
PUBLIC OFFICE UNDER TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR

SENATE BILL 65 5
2. PUBLICLY ANNOUNCES THAT THE POTENTIAL
CANDIDATE HAS DECLINED TO FILE A CERTIFICATE OF CANDIDACY FOR PUBLIC
OFFICE; OR
(II) THE DEADLINE FOR FILING A CERTIFICATE OF CANDIDACY
UNDER TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS ARTICLE HAS PASSED.
(2) AN EXPLORATORY COMMITTEE SHALL RETURN FUNDS UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) PRO RATA TO THE CONTRIBUTORS; OR
(II) BY PAYING THE REMAINING FUNDS TO:
1. IF THE POTENTIAL CANDIDATE IS A MEMBER OF A
POLITICAL PARTY:
A. THE STATE CENTRAL COMMITTEE OF THE POLITICAL
PARTY; OR
B. A LOCAL CENTRAL COMMITTEE OF THE POLITICAL
PARTY;
2. IF THE POTENTIAL CANDIDATE ESTABLISHES AN
AUTHORIZED CANDIDATE CAMPAIGN COMMITTEE, SUBJECT TO § 13–226 OF THIS
TITLE, THE AUTHORIZED CANDIDATE CAMPAIGN COMMITTEE;
3. A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION EXEMPT FROM
TAXATION UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE; OR
4. THE FAIR CAMPAIGN FINANCING FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 15–103 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(H) A DONATION TO AN EXPLORATORY COMMITTEE IS NOT SUBJECT TO ANY
LIMITS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.